Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 4

Tenant Obligations

66-28-401. General maintenance and conduct obligations.

The tenant shall:

Comply with all obligations primarily imposed upon tenants by applicable provisions of building and housing codes materially affecting health and safety;

Keep that part of the premises that the tenant occupies and uses as clean and safe as the condition of the premises when the tenant took possession;

Dispose from the tenant's dwelling unit all ashes, rubbish, garbage, and other waste to the designated collection areas and into receptacles;

Not deliberately or negligently destroy, deface, damage, impair or remove any part of the premises or permit any person to do so; and shall not engage in any illegal conduct on the premises; and

Act and require other persons on the premises, with the tenant's or other occupants' consent, to act in a manner that will not disturb the neighbors' peaceful enjoyment of the premises.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 3.101; T.C.A., § 64-2831; Acts 2005, ch. 156, § 4.

Cross-References. Covenant to leave in good repair, §66-7-102.

Law Reviews.

Avoiding Lease-Drafting Pitfalls (C. Dewees Berry IV), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1983).

66-28-402. Rules and regulations.

A landlord, from time to time, may adopt rules or regulations, however described, concerning the tenant's use and occupancy of the premises. It is enforceable against the tenant only if:

Its purpose is to promote the convenience, safety, or welfare of the tenants in the premises, preserve the landlord's property from abusive use, or make a fair distribution of services and facilities held out for the tenants generally;

It is reasonably related to the purpose for which it is adopted;

It applies to all tenants in the premises;

It is sufficiently explicit in its prohibition, direction, or limitation of the tenant's conduct to fairly inform the tenant of what the tenant must or must not do to comply;

It is not for the purpose of evading the obligations of the landlord; and

The tenant has notice of it at the time the tenant enters into the rental agreement.

A rule or regulation adopted after the tenant enters into the rental agreement is enforceable against the tenant if reasonable notice of its adoption is given to the tenant and it does not work a substantial modification of the rental agreement.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 3.102; T.C.A., § 64-2832.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-403. Access by landlord.

The tenant shall not unreasonably withhold consent to the landlord to enter onto the premises, including entering into the dwelling unit, in order to inspect the premises, make necessary or agreed repairs, decorations, alterations, or improvements, supply necessary or agreed services, or exhibit the premises to prospective or actual purchasers, mortgagees, workers or contractors.

The landlord may enter the premises without consent of the tenant in case of emergency. “Emergency” means a sudden, generally unexpected occurrence or set of circumstances demanding immediate action.

Where no known emergency exists, if any utilities have been turned off due to no fault of the landlord, the landlord shall be permitted to enter the premises. The landlord may inspect the premises to ascertain any damages to the premises and make necessary repairs of damages resulting from the lack of utilities.

The landlord shall not abuse the right of access or use it to harass the tenant.

The landlord has no right of access to the premises except:

By court order;

As permitted by this section, § 66-28-506 and § 66-28-507(b);

If the tenant has abandoned or surrendered the premises;

If the tenant is deceased, incapacitated or incarcerated; or

Within the final thirty (30) days of the termination of the rental agreement for the purpose of showing the premises to prospective tenants; provided, that such right of access is set forth in the rental agreement and notice is given to the tenant at least twenty-four (24) hours prior to entry.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 3.103; T.C.A., § 64-2833; Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 272, § 16 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to rental agreements entered into on or after October 1, 2011.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-404. Use and occupation by tenant.

Unless otherwise agreed, the tenant shall occupy the dwelling unit only as a dwelling unit. The rental agreement may require that the tenant notify the landlord of any anticipated extended absence from the premises in excess of seven (7) days. Notice shall be given on or before the first day of any extended absence.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 3.104; T.C.A., § 64-2834.

Collateral References.

Implied covenant or obligation to provide lessee with actual possession. 96 A.L.R.3d 1155.

Lease provisions allowing termination or forfeiture for violation of law. 92 A.L.R.3d 967.

66-28-405. Abandonment.

The tenant's unexplained or extended absence from the premises for thirty (30) days or more without payment of rent as due shall be prima facie evidence of abandonment. The landlord is then expressly authorized to reenter and take possession of the premises.

The tenant's nonpayment of rent for fifteen (15) days past the rental due date, together with other reasonable factual circumstances indicating the tenant has permanently vacated the premises, including, but not limited to, the removal by the tenant of substantially all of the tenant's possessions and personal effects from the premises, or the tenant's voluntary termination of utility service to the premises, shall also be prima facie evidence of abandonment.

In cases described in subdivision (b)(1), the landlord shall post notice at the rental premises and shall also send the notice to the tenant by regular mail, postage prepaid, at the rental premises address. The notice shall state that:

The landlord has reason to believe that the tenant has abandoned the premises;

The landlord intends to reenter and take possession of the premises, unless the tenant contacts the landlord within ten (10) days of the posting and mailing of the notice;

If the tenant does not contact the landlord within the ten-day period, the landlord intends to remove any and all possessions and personal effects remaining in or on the premises and to rerent the dwelling unit; and

If the tenant does not reclaim the possessions and personal effects within thirty (30) days of the landlord taking possession of the possessions and personal effects, the landlord intends to dispose of the tenant's possessions and personal effects as provided for in subsection (c).

The notice shall also include a telephone number and a mailing address at which the landlord may be contacted.

If the tenant fails to contact the landlord within ten (10) days of the posting and mailing of the notice, the landlord may reenter and take possession of the premises. If the tenant contacts the landlord within ten (10) days of the posting and mailing of the notice and indicates the tenant's intention to remain in possession of the rental premises, the landlord shall comply with the provisions of this chapter relative to termination of tenancy and recovery of possession of the premises through judicial process.

When proceeding under either subsection (a) or (b), the landlord shall remove the tenant's possessions and personal effects from the premises and store the personal possessions and personal effects for not less than thirty (30) days. The tenant may reclaim the possessions and personal effects from the landlord within the thirty-day period. If the tenant does not reclaim the possessions and personal effects within the thirty-day period, the landlord may sell or otherwise dispose of the tenant's possessions and personal effects and apply the proceeds of the sale to the unpaid rents, damages, storage fees, sale costs and attorney's fees. Any balances are to be held by the landlord for a period of six (6) months after the sale.

Acts 1975, ch. 245, § 3.105; T.C.A., § 64-2835; Acts 2005, ch. 156, § 5.

Cross-References. Disposition of unclaimed property, title 66, ch. 29.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-28-406. Exception to policy prohibiting or limiting, or requiring payment for, animals or pets for tenant or prospective tenant with disability who requires use of service animal or support animal.

As used in this section:

“Disability” means:

A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more major life activities;

A record of an impairment described in subdivision (a)(1)(A); or

Being regarded as having an impairment described in subdivision (a)(1)(A);

“Health care” means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, or treat an individual's physical or mental condition;

“Healthcare provider” means a person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of any state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession;

“Reliable documentation” means written documentation provided by:

A healthcare provider with actual knowledge of an individual's disability;

An individual or entity with a valid, unrestricted license, certification, or registration to serve persons with disabilities with actual knowledge of an individual's disability; or

A caregiver, reliable third party, or a governmental entity with actual knowledge of an individual's disability;

“Service animal” means a dog or miniature horse that has been individually trained to work or perform tasks for an individual with a disability; and

“Support animal” means an animal selected to accompany an individual with a disability that has been prescribed or recommended by a healthcare provider to work, provide assistance, or perform tasks for the benefit of the individual with a disability, or provide emotional support that alleviates one (1) or more identified symptoms or effects of the individual's disability.

A tenant or prospective tenant with a disability who requires the use of a service animal or support animal may request an exception to a landlord's policy that prohibits or limits animals or pets on the premises or that requires any payment by a tenant to have an animal or pet on the premises.

A landlord who receives a request made under subsection (b) from a tenant or prospective tenant may ask that the individual, whose disability is not readily apparent or known to the landlord, submit reliable documentation of a disability and the disability-related need for a service animal or support animal. If the disability is readily apparent or known but the disability-related need for the service animal or support animal is not, then the landlord may ask the individual to submit reliable documentation of the disability-related need for a service animal or support animal.

A landlord who receives reliable documentation under subsection (c) may verify the reliable documentation. However, nothing in this subsection (d) authorizes a landlord to obtain confidential or protected medical records or confidential or protected medical information concerning a tenant's or prospective tenant's disability.

A landlord may deny a request made under subsection (b) if a tenant or prospective tenant fails to provide accurate, reliable documentation that meets the requirements of subsection (c), after the landlord requests the reliable documentation.

It is deemed to be material noncompliance and default by the tenant with the rental agreement, if the tenant:

Misrepresents that there is a disability or disability-related need for the use of a service animal or support animal; or

Provides documentation under subsection (c) that falsely states an animal is a service animal or support animal.

In the event of any violation of subdivision (f)(1), the landlord may terminate the tenancy and recover damages, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney's fees.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a landlord is not liable for injuries by a person's service animal or support animal permitted on the premises as a reasonable accommodation to assist the person with a disability pursuant to the Fair Housing Act, as amended, (42 U.S.C. §§ 3601 et seq.); the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq.); Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, (29 U.S.C. § 701); or any other federal, state, or local law.

Only to the extent it conflicts with federal or state law, this section does not apply to public housing units owned by a governmental entity.

Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6 provided that the act shall apply to any rental agreement entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2019, and any request for an exception to a landlord's policy that prohibits or limits animals on the property made on or after July 1, 2019.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.